California statutes. Financial Code
The commissioner may forthwith upon written notice and order take possession of the property and business of Fidelity Corporation and retain possession until Fidelity Corporation satisfies the commissioner that it will operate in conformity with this chapter whenever it appears to the commissioner that Fidelity Corporation has done any of the following:

(a) Violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state.

(b) Invested its funds in violation of Section 17337.

(c) Not levied assessments as required by Sections 17320, 17321 and 17321.1. 

(d) Has not diligently prosecuted an action pursuant to Section 17323.

(e) Violated any section of this chapter.

(f) Neglected or refused to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of the commissioner.

During the time the commissioner has possession the commissioner shall perform the duties and carry out the obligations of Fidelity Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1431, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

17334.

Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of Fidelity Corporation, Fidelity Corporation within 10 business days after the taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the head office of Fidelity Corporation is located to enjoin further proceedings. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined, and after a hearing and a determination of the facts upon the merits, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender
 the property and business to Fidelity Corporation, or make a further order as may be just.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 22.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17335.

An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the court by the commissioner or by Fidelity Corporation in the manner provided by law for appeals from the judgment of a superior court to the court of appeal. An appeal from the judgment of the court does not operate as a stay of the judgment unless the court, on good cause, so orders. No bond need be given if the appeal is taken by the commissioner, but if the appeal is taken by Fidelity Corporation a bond shall be given as required by Sections 917.2 and 917.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure as a condition to any
 stay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 148.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17336.

(a) Fidelity Corporation shall have independent authority to investigate claims filed by members pursuant to Section 17330.

(b) Fidelity Corporation, upon submitting written notice to the commissioner, may conduct an examination or investigation of the business practices of a member’s handling and processing of trust obligations or the failure to pay an assessment under Section 17320, 17321, or 17321.1. The result of every investigation or examination shall be reported to the
 commissioner together with the recommendations of the Board of Directors of Fidelity Corporation. The investigation or examination reports prepared by the duly designated representatives of the board of the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation shall not be public records.

(c) Fidelity Corporation may submit reports and make recommendations to a member on its findings as a result of an examination or investigation conducted pursuant to this section. These reports and recommendations shall not be public documents. A copy of all reports and recommendations shall be furnished to the commissioner by Fidelity Corporation. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, Fidelity Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees, stockholders, or agents or the commissioner or commissioner’s authorized representatives for any statements made by them in any reports or recommendations made
 hereunder.

(d) Fidelity Corporation, upon the request of the commissioner, may participate in an examination or investigation of the books and records of a member. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the State of California, the commissioner, or members of the commissioner’s staff or the commissioner’s authorized representative for the release of any information furnished to Fidelity Corporation pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) With the written consent of a majority of its directors, Fidelity Corporation, in order to fulfill its obligations under this section, may appoint an independent certified public accountant or public accountant or hire or appoint a specialized committee or employees to conduct an examination or investigation authorized by this section. Any reports as a result thereof shall be furnished to
 the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (c).

(f) For the purposes of conducting an examination or investigation, Fidelity Corporation or its appointee shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, bank account records and statements, papers, records, files, safes and vaults of the member.

(g) Fidelity Corporation may cause an examination or audit of the places of business, books, accounts, bank account records, papers, records, files, safes and vaults of a member to be conducted in accordance with Fidelity Corporation’s bylaws and rules.

(h) Costs and expenses for the examination or investigation conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be paid to the Fidelity Corporation by the licensee, its shareholders, directors, and officers, or person examined, each of whom
 shall be jointly and severally liable therefor. The Fidelity Corporation may maintain an action for recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall recover its reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, provided that the payment of the costs and attorney’s fees will not cause the member to be in violation of Section 17202, 17202.1, or 17210.

(i) Fidelity Corporation, any member of Fidelity Corporation, an agent of Fidelity Corporation or of its members, or any person who uses any information obtained under this section for any purpose not authorized herein is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(j) Fidelity Corporation may cause an examination or audit of a member, to be conducted in accordance with Fidelity
 Corporation’s Bylaws and Rules, whenever:

(1) The member has failed to pay an assessment as provided for under Section 17320, 17321, or 17321.1.

(2) Fidelity Corporation has received any information of irregular or improper handling of the trust obligations of the member or of an occurrence which may give rise to a claim for loss of trust obligations.

(3) Fidelity Corporation so elects, either with or without notice.

(k) Costs and expenses for any examination under this section shall be paid for by the member. Fidelity Corporation shall also be entitled to recover costs and expenses for any examination under this section from those persons, if any, who are discovered to be responsible for, or to have caused, any irregular or improper handling of trust
 obligations of the member or any occurrence which may give rise to a claim for loss of trust obligations, or otherwise by failure to cooperate, unnecessarily increase the cost of the examination. Fidelity Corporation may maintain an action for recovery of these examination costs and expenses in any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall recover its reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, provided that the payment of the costs and attorney’s fees will not cause the member to be in violation of Section 17202, 17202.1, or 17210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 492, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17337.

Fidelity Corporation may invest its funds only as provided by rules of the commissioner adopted with a view to preserving reasonable liquidity.

Upon request of the commissioner, Fidelity Corporation shall furnish an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of funds pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 25.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17339.

Prior to incurring any extraordinary or nonrecurring expense, Fidelity Corporation shall first obtain the written consent of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 26.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17340.

In the event the board of directors of Fidelity Corporation deem it necessary and prudent to raise additional moneys for payment of claims or expenses of administration, it may, with the commissioner’s written consent, borrow money against its assets, including future assessments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 28.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17341.

The commissioner shall give prompt notice to Fidelity Corporation when the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a member and shall give further prompt notice when the commissioner determines to liquidate the property and business of a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 29.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17342.

Memberships issued by Fidelity Corporation shall be nontransferable and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 30.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17343.

No provision of the Insurance Code shall apply to Fidelity Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 31.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17344.

The operation of Fidelity Corporation shall at all times be subject to the regulation of the commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives. The commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives may at any time investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used by Fidelity Corporation. The commissioner and the commissioner’s duly designated representatives shall have free access to the offices, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of Fidelity Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 32.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17345.

Any member aggrieved by any action or decision of Fidelity Corporation may appeal to the commissioner within 30 days from the action or decision, except that all matters relating to claims for loss of trust obligations shall be decided under Section 17345.1. The commissioner’s decision on appeal shall be made within 60 days from the date of the appeal and shall be considered final.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 370, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17345.1.

(a) A member or successor in interest aggrieved by any action or decision of Fidelity Corporation may file a written request for a hearing with the commissioner within 30 days from the action or decision.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge on the staff of the Office of Administrative Hearings and the administrative law judge’s proposed decision shall be made within 120 days from the date of the request for hearing. This time limit does not constitute a jurisdictional deadline and may be extended by stipulation of the parties or by order of the administrative law judge for good cause.

(2) The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the administrative adjudication provisions of Chapters 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except as specified in this subdivision.

(3) The following sections of the Government Code shall not apply to a hearing under this subdivision: Section 11503 (relating to accusations), Section 11504 (relating to statements of issues), Section 11505 (relating to contents of the statement to respondent), Section 11506 (relating to the notice of defense), Section 11507 (relating to amended or supplemental accusations), and Section 11516 (relating to amendment of accusations after submission of case).

(4) The sole parties to the hearing shall be the member or successor in
 interest (complainant) and Fidelity Corporation (respondent). Third-party intervention shall not be permitted. The disputes, claims, and interests of third parties shall not be within the jurisdiction of the proceedings. However, nothing in this paragraph prohibits any interested party from submitting an amicus brief upon approval by the administrative law judge, after a duly noticed motion demonstrating good cause.

(5) Within 10 days of receipt of the request for a hearing, the commissioner shall schedule the hearing with the Office of Administrative Hearings and shall serve each party by personal service or mail with notice of the hearing, which is to include the date, time, and place of the hearing.

(A) Within 10 days of service of the notice of hearing, the complainant shall file with the Office of Administrative Hearings, and serve upon the respondent by personal service or
 mail, a written statement setting forth the matters to be considered at the hearing in sufficient detail to permit the respondent to prepare and present its response. The statement shall contain the following:

(i) A brief statement of the facts that give rise to the hearing.

(ii) A statement of the issues to be considered at the hearing including relevant statutes and rules. If the statement includes issues not raised in the proof of loss claim or considered by respondent in its decision, respondent may move for abatement of the proceedings for consideration of those issues by respondent. The administrative law judge may abate the proceedings for a period not to exceed 60 days from the issuance of the order to abate. The administrative law judge may extend the time period for good cause upon motion by respondent or by stipulation of the parties. If respondent has not issued a
 revised decision within the period of abatement, the administrative law judge shall reset the matter for hearing.

(B) Within 20 days of service of the statement, respondent may file with the Office of Administrative Hearings, and serve upon the complainant by personal service or mail a written response to the statement.

(C) The statement of issues and response may be amended upon completion of discovery, except that notice of the amendment shall be no later than 30 days before the date set for hearing.

(6) Where the statement of issues includes a claim for a loss of trust obligations that has been denied by respondent, complainant shall bear the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that a loss as defined in Section 17304 has occurred and that respondent is required to pay the claim in accordance
 with this chapter. Each legal issue shall be adjudicated in the proposed decision and the commissioner’s decision, except for any issue either withdrawn or waived by complainant or respondent, upon the submission of the case after hearing.

(7) Any party may move for a judgment on the pleadings or summary judgment, as a dispositive motion, pursuant to the Rules of Procedure of the Office of Administrative Hearings. The evidence in support of and standards for deciding the motions shall be as set forth in the Code of Civil Procedure. If the administrative law judge denies the motion, the matter shall be heard on the merits by the administrative law judge. If the administrative law judge grants the motion, the order shall be in the form of a proposed decision to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(8) Nothing in this section shall be
 construed to require the losing party to pay the other party’s costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees.

(9) If the statement of issues is abated and respondent issues a revised decision, the parties may amend their pleadings within a reasonable period of time, as ordered by the administrative law judge.

(c) (1) If a request for hearing includes a claim for loss of trust obligations that has been denied by Fidelity Corporation and the claim involves the factors described in paragraph (3), the commissioner, upon the request of Fidelity Corporation and as provided herein, shall abstain from proceeding with a hearing. The matter may be adjudicated in a court of competent jurisdiction upon the filing of an action by the member or successor in interest. Fidelity Corporation shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of the grounds for abstention of
 jurisdiction within five days of the filing of the request for a hearing by the member or successor in interest. The commissioner shall rule on the abstention of jurisdiction request within 10 days of the notice and the ruling shall be considered final. In making a determination on the request for abstention, the commissioner may examine and investigate all facts connected with the request for abstention and may request information from any person as deemed necessary.

(2) If the commissioner denies the request for abstention of jurisdiction, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with subdivision (b), except that compliance by the commissioner with paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) shall be within five days of the ruling denying the abstention request.

(3) The factors requiring abstention of jurisdiction by the commissioner are as follows:

(A) The claim for a loss is based upon an alleged escrow transaction in which an officer, director, trustee, stockholder, manager, or employee of the member was a principal to the transaction.

(B) The claim involves (i) the need to determine conflicting claims or disputes to real property and (ii) there is a potential for double recovery by any principal to an escrow.

(4) The commissioner shall abstain if determination of the claim will cause some escrows to have preferable or favorable treatment over the other escrows held by the member or successor in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 97.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17346.

(a) Fidelity Corporation and its members shall not advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner any statement or representation with regard to a guarantee of trust obligations in their advertisements that is false or misleading or calculated to deceive or misinform the public. Any statement or representation with regard to a guarantee of trust obligations, except the statement set forth in subdivision (b), shall be
 reviewed and approved by the commissioner prior to its use.

(b) Any advertising referring to Fidelity Corporation shall state in a clear and conspicuous manner, the following statement: 

“MEMBER OF ESCROW AGENTS’ FIDELITY CORPORATION (EAFC). EAFC PROVIDES FIDELITY COVERAGE TO ITS MEMBERS. EAFC IS NOT A GOVERNMENT AGENCY, AND THERE IS NO GUARANTEE OF A PAYMENT OF ANY CLAIM BY THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA.”

(c) Neither Fidelity Corporation nor its members shall advertise that trust obligations of escrow agents are “protected,” “guaranteed,” “insured,” or use words to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 237, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17347.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles for the incorporation of Fidelity Corporation or an amendment to the articles unless the commissioner has issued a written approval of the articles or amendment.

(b) Fidelity Corporation shall not adopt any bylaws or amendments thereto without the written consent of the commissioner. Within 60 calendar days from the receipt of any bylaws or amendments thereto, submitted to the commissioner, the commissioner shall inform
 Fidelity Corporation, in writing, that the bylaws or amendments are not disapproved, or that those bylaws or amendments are disapproved and specify the information needed to complete the submittal. Within 60 calendar days from the receipt of a complete submittal, the commissioner shall reach a decision on the submittal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 476, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17348.

In order to permit Fidelity Corporation to fulfill its obligation under this chapter, the commissioner shall furnish a list of all persons licensed under this division as of December 31 of each year and a copy of an escrow liability schedule filed with the commissioner. Each member on or before February 15 shall furnish to the commissioner and Fidelity Corporation the schedule of its escrow liability for each of its licensed locations as of the last day of each month for the preceding 12 months which ended December 31. A list of officers, directors,
 stockholders, trustees, agents, managers, and employees as of that date shall also be submitted to Fidelity Corporation, with the schedule. The schedule shall be in the form and contain such information as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 492, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17349.

If Fidelity Corporation is dissolved, subject to the approval of the commissioner, the net assets after settling all liabilities shall be distributed to the members on the basis of the number of each member’s licensed locations compared to the total number of all members’ licensed locations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 36.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17350.

All costs and expenses incurred by the commissioner in the administration of this chapter shall be paid to the commissioner by Fidelity Corporation. The limitation on the total assessment for each year set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 17207 shall not apply to Fidelity Corporation’s payment of costs and expenses incurred by the commissioner in the administration of this chapter. The commissioner may institute an action for the recovery of costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 37.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Escrow Regulations [17400. - 17425.]

17400.

The commissioner may from time to time make, amend, and rescind the rules, forms, and orders that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this division, and define any terms, whether or not used in this division, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this division. For the purpose of rules and forms, the commissioner may, among other things, classify persons and matters within the commissioner’s jurisdiction and may prescribe different requirements for different classes. The commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion,
 waive any requirement of any rule or form in situations where in his or her opinion the requirement is not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17402.

No person subject to this division or any officer thereof shall advertise in any manner or publish any statement of its capital, other than amounts fully paid in and accumulated surplus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 475.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.

(a) No person subject to this division shall issue, circulate, or publish any advertisement by any means of communication, or make use of or circulate any letterheads, billheads, blank notes, blank receipts, blank escrow instructions, certificates, circulars, or any written, printed, partially written or printed paper containing any fictitious or corporate name or other words indicating that the person is in the escrow business, unless the person is a licensed escrow agent.

(b) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, any person has violated this section, the commissioner
 may order that person to desist and refrain from that violation. If, within 30 days after the order is served, a request for hearing is filed in writing and the hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is rescinded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 564, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.1.

No person subject to this division shall describe as an escrow, whether orally, in writing, or electronically, any transaction that is not defined as such in Section 17003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.2.

(a) No person subject to this division shall solicit or accept an escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction containing any blank to be filled in after signing or initialing of the escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction, nor permit any person to make any addition to, deletion from, or alteration of an escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction, unless the addition, deletion or alteration is signed or initialed by all persons who had signed or initialed the escrow
 instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction prior to the addition, deletion or alteration.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), no Internet escrow agent subject to this division shall solicit or accept electronically over the Internet an escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction containing any blank to be filled in after executing that escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction, nor permit any person to electronically, over the Internet, make any addition to, deletion from, or alteration of an escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction, unless that addition, deletion or alteration is executed by all persons who had executed the escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction prior to the addition, deletion, or alteration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.3.

(a) At the time of execution a copy of each escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction shall be delivered to all persons executing the same.

(b) Internet escrow agents shall deliver electronically over the Internet a copy of each executed escrow instruction or amended or supplemental escrow instruction to all persons executing the same. In the event a person is not able to electronically receive the instructions, the Internet escrow agent shall mail a
 true and correct copy of the instructions to the person within 24 hours of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.4.

All written escrow instructions and all escrow instructions transmitted electronically over the Internet executed by a buyer or seller, whether prepared by a person subject to this division or by a person exempt from this division under Section 17006, shall contain a statement in not less than 10-point type which shall include the license name and the name of the department issuing the license or authority under which the person is operating. This section shall not apply to supplemental escrow instructions or modifications to escrow instructions.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.5.

(a) All records required by this chapter may be retained by an Internet escrow agent and provided to the commissioner in electronic format.

(b) All transfers by an Internet escrow agent between trust accounts and interest-bearing accounts, and between escrow accounts, may be made electronically.

(c) A statement of account may be delivered by an Internet escrow agent to a customer by electronic mail or via the
 Internet, unless otherwise requested by the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 437, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17404.

Every person subject to this division shall keep and use in its business, books, accounts, and records which will properly enable the commissioner to determine whether the escrow functions performed by such person comply with the provisions of this division and with all rules made by the commissioner under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 705.)
-------------------------------------------

17405.

(a) The business, accounts and records of every person performing as an escrow agent, whether required to be licensed under this division or not, are subject to inspection and examination by the commissioner at any time without prior notice. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons specified in Section 17006.

(b) Any person subject to this division shall, upon request, exhibit and allow inspection and copying of any books and records by the commissioner or his or
 her authorized representative.

(c) (1) The commissioner shall conduct an examination of each licensed escrow agent as described in subdivision (a) as often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate, but not less than once every 48 months.

(2) The examination shall be conducted for the 12-month period immediately preceding the date that the examination is commenced unless the commissioner finds, based on information uncovered in the examination or in the most recent independent audit report, that the examination should be extended beyond the 12-month period.

(3) In determining how often an examination shall be conducted, the commissioner may consider each licensed escrow agent’s compliance with the requirements set forth in this division and other factors the commissioner may by rule or
 order designate.

(4) This subdivision shall apply only to examinations commenced after the effective date established by the rule or order of the commissioner for the factors described in paragraph (3).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the commissioner may conduct an indoctrination or preliminary examination, or both, under this section of any new licensee within one year of the issuance of the license under this division, and an examination described in subdivision (a) within two years of the issuance of the license under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 499, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17405.1.

The cost of every inspection and examination of a licensee or other person subject to this division shall be paid to the commissioner by the licensee or person examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of an inspection or examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing inspections or examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

For the purposes of this section only, no person other than a licensee shall be deemed
 to be a person subject to this division unless and until the person is determined to be a person subject to this division by an administrative hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or by a judicial hearing in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 946, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17406.

(a) Each licensee shall submit to the commissioner, at the licensee’s own expense, an audit report containing audited financial statements covering the calendar year or, if the licensee has an established fiscal year, then for that fiscal year, within 105 days after the close of the calendar or fiscal year, as applicable. At that time, each licensee shall also file additional relevant information as the commissioner may require.

(b) Within 30 days after receipt of a request from
 the commissioner, a licensee or other person subject to this division shall submit to the commissioner, at the person’s own expense, an audit report containing audited financial statements covering the 12 calendar months next preceding the month of receipt of the request, or for another period as the commissioner may require. Unless the public interest shall otherwise require, the commissioner shall exempt a licensee from the provisions of subdivision (a) in whole or in part if the licensee has complied with a request pursuant to this subdivision as of a date within the calendar or fiscal year for which the exemption is granted.

(c) A licensee whose license has been revoked shall submit to the commissioner, at its own expense, on or before 105 days after the effective date of the revocation, a closing audit report as of that effective date, or for another period as the commissioner may specify. The report shall include the information specified
 by the commissioner. A licensee who has complied with this subdivision is exempt from subdivision (a) of this section.

(d) The reports and financial statements referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall include at least a balance sheet and a statement of income for the year ended on the balance sheet date together with other relevant information as the commissioner may require. The reports and financial statements referred to in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and shall be accompanied by a report, certificate, or opinion of, an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and the rules of the commissioner.

(e) A licensee shall make other special reports to the commissioner as the
 commissioner may from time to time require.

(f) For good cause and upon written request, the commissioner may extend the time for compliance with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(g) A licensee shall, when requested by the commissioner, submit its unaudited financial statements, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and consisting of at least a balance sheet and statement of income and expense as of the date and for the period specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the submission of these reports on a monthly or other periodic basis.

(h) If the report, certificate, or opinion of the independent accountant referred to in subdivision (d) is in any way qualified, the commissioner may require the licensee to take action as he or she deems appropriate to permit an independent
 accountant to remove the qualifications from the report, certificate, or opinion.

(i) The commissioner may reject any financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion by notifying the licensee or other person required to make the filing of its rejection and the cause of the rejection. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the licensee or other person shall correct the deficiency and the failure so to do shall be deemed a violation of this division. The commissioner shall retain a copy of all rejected filings.

(j) The commissioner may make rules specifying the form and content of the reports and financial statements referred to in this section, and may require that those reports and financial statements be verified by the licensee in the manner as he or she may prescribe.

(k) Upon completion of the
 reports and financial statements referred to in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the independent accountant shall submit to the commissioner complete copies of the reports and financial statements at the same time that copies of the reports and financial statements are submitted to the licensee.

(l) A licensee who engages an independent accountant or other third-party contractor to reconcile trust account records shall request the independent accountant or third-party contractor, at a minimum, to immediately notify the commissioner and Fidelity Corporation in the event of any of the following:

(1) The termination or voluntary withdrawal of the independent accountant or third-party contractor from the engagement.

(2) The discovery by the independent accountant or third-party contractor of an unreconcilable trust
 account debit balance. A debit balance exists if an escrow agent withdraws, pays out, or transfers money from an escrow account in excess of the amount to the credit of that account at the time of the withdrawal, payment, or transfer.

(3) The discovery by the independent accountant or third-party contractor that trust account reconciliations have not been performed for two months after the end of any calendar month.

(4) The discovery by the independent accountant or third-party contractor of exception items in trust account exception reports, that remain uncorrected for two months after the end of any calendar month.

Notification pursuant to this subdivision may be accomplished by transmitting to the commissioner and Fidelity Corporation, in either electronic or paper form, copies of trust account reconciliation exception reports. Nothing
 in this subdivision imposes any duty or obligation on an independent accountant or third-party contractor to Fidelity Corporation, members of Fidelity Corporation, or the commissioner.

(m) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a licensee to contract with a third party to reconcile trust account records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17406.1.

(a) Whenever the reports and financial statements required pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 17406 are to be reported upon or certified by an accountant other than the accountant reporting upon or certifying the licensee’s most recent reports or financial statements, the licensee shall furnish the commissioner with a written notice stating whether there was any disagreement with the former accountant on any matter in connection with the preparation of the most recent reports or financial statements reported upon or certified